Wisconsin, session 2025, AB268.
do enact as follows:AB268,11Section 1. 5.06 (8) of the statutes is amended to read:AB268,2,1025.06 (8) Any election official or complainant who is aggrieved by an order 3issued under sub. (6) may appeal the decision of the commission to circuit court for 4the county where the official conducts business or the complainant resides no later 5than 30 days after issuance of the order. Pendency of an appeal does not stay the 6effect of an order unless the court so orders. A complainant shall be considered 7aggrieved under this subsection regardless of whether the complainant has 8suffered an injury to a legally recognized interest and may appeal any order issued 9under sub. (6) that dismisses the complaint or otherwise does not grant the relief 10requested in the complaint.AB268,2,1111